North Carolina statutes. Chapter 41. Estates.
Article 3. Time Limits on Options in Gross and Certain Other Interests in Land.

Commentary

Article 3 is based upon a proposed Uniform Act that is under consideration by the Joint Editorial Board for the Uniform Probate Code.

G.S. 41-28

and 41-33 have no counterpart in the proposed Uniform Act.

The following comments were prepared to accompany the proposed Uniform Act. The drafters of the North Carolina Act believe that these comments provide a useful guide to the Act. Minor changes have been made to correspond to the North Carolina Act.

Some transactions respecting land, such as options in gross (including rights of first refusal), leases to commence in the future, and nonvested easements, directly or indirectly restrain the alienability of property or provide a disincentive to improve the property.

Article 3 contains sections that generally impose a 30-year time limit on such interests. To prevent an overlap with Article 2 of this Chapter,

G.S. 41-18

(9) excludes such interests from the Statutory Rule Against Perpetuities. (Many but not all such interests are also excluded by other subdivisions of

G.S. 41-18

.) The 90-year permissible vesting period of the Statutory Rule Against Perpetuities is an inappropriate limit on these interests. As an approximation of the period of a life in being plus 21 years, the 90-year period is an appropriate limit on interests arising out of family-oriented donative transfers. A shorter period is a more appropriate limit on the interests covered in Article 3, whether those interests arise out of a donative or a nondonative transfer.

The sections in this Article contain language exempting arrangements relating solely to interests in oil, gas, or minerals. The purpose is to assure that these sections do not interfere with bona fide commercial arrangements in the oil, gas, and mining industries.

§ 41-28.
Definitions.

As used in this Article:

“Nonvested easement in gross” means a nonvested easement which is not created to benefit or which does not benefit the possessor of any tract of land in his or her use of it as the possessor.

“Option in gross with respect to an interest in land” means an option in which the holder of the option does not own any leasehold or other interest in the land which is the subject of the option.

“Preemptive right in the nature of a right of first refusal in gross with respect to an interest in land” means a preemptive right in which the holder of the preemptive right does not own any leasehold or other interest in the land which is the subject of the preemptive right.

History.

1995, c. 525, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Perpetuities Reform in North Carolina: The Uniform Statutory Rule Against Perpetuities, Nondonative Transfers, and Honorary Trusts,” see 74 N.C.L. Rev. 1783 (1996).

§ 41-29.
Options in gross, etc.

An option in gross with respect to an interest in land or a preemptive right in the nature of a right of first refusal in gross with respect to an interest in land becomes invalid if it is not actually exercised within 30 years after its creation. For purposes of this section, the term “interest in land” does not include arrangements relating solely to an interest in oil, gas, or minerals.

History.

1995, c. 525, s. 1.

Commentary

This section imposes a 30-year time limit on the duration of options in gross and preemptive rights in gross with respect to an interest in land. The appellation “in gross” refers to the fact that the optionee or preemptioner has no possessory interest in the property.

If an option or preemptive right pertains to an interest in land, the option or preemptive right becomes invalid if it remains unexercised 30 years after its creation.

Example.
A, the owner of Blackacre, sells an option to B under which A obligates himself, his heirs, and assigns at any time in the future to convey Blackacre to B, his heirs, and assigns for $X.00. Or, A, the owner of Blackacre, sells Blackacre to B. As part of the transaction, B obligates himself, his heirs, and assigns at any time in the future to reconvey Blackacre to A, his heirs, and assigns for $X.00. If either option remains unexercised 30 years after its creation, it ceases to be valid. (Both options are excluded from the Statutory Rule Against Perpetuities by

G.S. 41-18(1)

and (9).)

Options Held by a Lessee Not Affected by this Section.
This section does not apply to an option or right of first refusal (preemptive right) that is not in gross. Thus, this section does not apply to an option or preemptive right held by a lessee to renew, extend, or enter into a new lease of or to purchase the leased premises. Such options or rights of first refusal do not deter the lessee from making improvements on the property, and so public policy is not viewed as requiring controls on their duration.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Perpetuities Reform in North Carolina: The Uniform Statutory Rule Against Perpetuities, Nondonative Transfers, and Honorary Trusts,” see 74 N.C.L. Rev. 1783 (1996).

§ 41-30.
Leases to commence in the future.

A lease to commence at a time certain or upon the occurrence or nonoccurrence of a future event becomes invalid if its term does not actually commence in possession within 30 years after its execution. For purposes of this section, the term “lease” does not include an oil, gas, or mineral lease.

History.

1995, c. 525, s. 1.

Commentary

G.S. 41-30

provides that a lease to commence at a time certain or upon the happening of a future event becomes invalid if the term does not actually commence in possession within 30 years after the lease’s execution.

Such leases are excluded from the Statutory Rule Against Perpetuities by

G.S. 41-18(1)

and (9). Excluding such leases from the Rule Against Perpetuities removes a source of considerable litigation under the common-law Rule Against Perpetuities concerning the validity of so-called “on completion” leases — leases to commence on the completion of a building.

Such leases would be clearly valid at common law if the lessor was obligated to complete the building within 21 years, but in the absence of an explicit obligation of this sort, some courts have held the lease to be invalid. E.g., Southern Airways Co. v. DeKalb County, 101 Ga. App. 689, 115 S.E.2d 207 (1960); others, though, have upheld such leases on the theory that the lessee’s interest was vested from the beginning (Isen v. Giant Food, Inc., 295 F.2d 136 (D.C. Cir. 1960)); or that there was an implicit obligation to complete the building within a reasonable time (Wong v. DiGrazia, 60 Cal.2d 525, 386 P.2d 817 (1963); Singer Co. v. Makad, Inc., 213 Kan. 725, 518 P.2d 493 (1974); see also Read v. GHDC, Inc., 334 S.E.2d 165 (Ga. 1985); Ryland Group, Inc. v. Wills, 331 S.E.2d 399 (Va. 1985)).

Although the risk under the common-law Rule Against Perpetuities that such leases would be declared invalid from the beginning would be removed by the wait-and-see feature of the Statutory Rule Against Perpetuities, such leases are excluded from the Statutory Rule entirely. A shorter period than the 90 years allowed by the Statutory Rule is more appropriate to commercial transactions that impinge upon the marketability of land, and the 30-year period selected should give reasonable time for such leases to commence in possession.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Perpetuities Reform in North Carolina: The Uniform Statutory Rule Against Perpetuities, Nondonative Transfers, and Honorary Trusts,” see 74 N.C.L. Rev. 1783 (1996).

§ 41-31.
Nonvested easements.

A nonvested easement in gross becomes invalid if it does not actually vest within 30 years after its creation.

History.

1995, c. 525, s. 1.

Commentary

This section places a 30-year limit on the time during which a nonvested easement in gross can remain nonvested. An easement is nonvested if the right of utilization is subject to a condition precedent, i.e., if the right of utilization is conditioned upon the happening of a specified future event. An easement is in gross if it has a servient estate but no dominant estate; an easement in gross is a personal interest in the land of another. The difficulty of locating the owner of a nonvested easement in gross as time goes along is the principal reason for limiting to 30 years the time during which the easement can remain nonvested.

Whether or not an easement is vested depends on whether the holder has the current right to utilize it. Thus, an easement can be vested even if the holder has not actually utilized it. If, however, the easement holder has actually utilized the easement, the easement is vested by definition. For example, an easement to transmit electric power across land from a power plant would be vested, if it had not previously vested, when the holder of the easement commenced to install power transmission lines on the land; vesting would not be delayed until power is actually transmitted through those lines.

This section does not limit the duration of a vested easement, nor does it affect an easement that is vested subject to a defeasance clause that may cause it to terminate. Nor does this section affect multiple floating easements, which are also called single expansible easements with multiple potential routes, because they are vested. E.g., Kleinheider v. Phillips Pipe Line Co., 528 F.2d 837, 843-44 (8th Cir. 1975).

Exemption from Rule Against Perpetuities.
Because nonvested easements in gross are governed by a 30-year time limit, they are exempted from the Statutory Rule Against Perpetuities by

G.S. 41-18(9)

. This reverses the rule at common law, under which nonvested easements were subjected to the common-law Rule Against Perpetuities and rendered invalid ab initio if they were not certain to vest or terminate within a life in being plus 21 years. J. Gray, The Rule Against Perpetuities §§ 314-16 (4th ed. 1942); L. Simes & A. Smith, The Law of Future Interests § 1248 (2d ed. 1956).

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Perpetuities Reform in North Carolina: The Uniform Statutory Rule Against Perpetuities, Nondonative Transfers, and Honorary Trusts,” see 74 N.C.L. Rev. 1783 (1996).

§ 41-32.
Possibilities of reverter, etc.

Except as otherwise provided in this section:

A possibility of reverter preceded by a fee simple determinable;

A right of entry preceded by a fee simple subject to a condition subsequent; or

An executory interest preceded by either a fee simple determinable or a fee simple subject to an executory limitation;

becomes invalid, and the preceding fee simple becomes a fee simple absolute, if the right to vest in possession of the possibility of reverter, right of entry, or executory interest depends on an event or events affecting the use of land and if the possibility of reverter, right of entry, or executory interest does not actually vest in possession within 60 years after its creation.

This section does not apply to a possibility of reverter, right of entry, or executory interest held by a charity, a government or governmental agency or subdivision excluded from the Uniform Statutory Rule Against Perpetuities by

G.S. 41-18(5)

or to an arrangement relating solely to an interest in oil, gas, or minerals.

History.

1995, c. 525, s. 1.

Commentary

With certain exceptions, this section imposes a 60-year time limit on the duration of certain possibilities of reverter, rights of entry (also known as rights of re-entry, rights of entry for condition broken, and powers of termination), and executory interests.

Possibilities of reverter and rights of entry are generally exempt from the common-law Rule Against Perpetuities. But their nonreversionary counterpart — the executory interest that follows either a fee simple determinable or a fee simple subject to an executory limitation — is subject to the common-law Rule. By statute in some states, possibilities of reverter and rights of entry expire if they do not vest within a specified period of years (such as 30 or 40 years). These statutes, however, do not apply to the type of executory interest described above, which is the nonreversionary counterpart of the possibility of reverter and/or right of entry.

G.S. 41-32

treats all three future interests alike by limiting their duration to 60 years and by excluding them from the Statutory Rule. Unless the possibility of reverter, right of entry, or executory interest is an interest in favor of a charity, government, or governmental agency or subdivision that is excluded from the Statutory Rule by

G.S. 41-18(5)

[or is an arrangement relating solely to an interest in oil, gas, or minerals], the maximum period any of the three can exist is limited to 60 years; if it has not vested by the 60th anniversary of its creation, it ceases to exist and the preceding fee simple becomes a fee simple absolute.

Example 1.
G deeded real property: [Alternative 1] “to the City of Sidney for as long as the property is used for a public park, and upon the property ceasing to be used for that purpose, the property is to go to B and his heirs.”

[Alternative 2] “to the City of Sidney for as long as the property is used for a public park, and upon the property ceasing to be used for that purpose, the property is to revert to G and his heirs.”

In both alternatives, the City of Sidney has a fee simple determinable. In Alternative 1, B has an executory interest. In Alternative 2, G has a possibility of reverter. Both B’s and G’s future interests are excluded from the Statutory Rule by

G.S. 41-18(9)

. Both are subject to the 60-year limit on their existence imposed by

G.S. 41-32

. If the property is still being used for a public park on the 60th anniversary of the date of delivery of G’s deed, the City of Sidney’s fee simple becomes a fee simple absolute.

Example 2.
G deeded real property: [Alternative 1] “to A and his heirs on condition that the property be used for residential purposes, and if the property is not used for residential purposes, G is to have the right to re-enter and take possession of the premises.”

[Alternative 2] “to A and his heirs, but if the property is not used for residential purposes, to B and his heirs.” In Alternative 1, A has a fee simple subject to a condition subsequent; G has a right of entry that is excluded from the Statutory Rule Against Perpetuities. In Alternative 2, A has a fee simple subject to an executory limitation; B has an executory interest that is excluded from the Statutory Rule Against Perpetuities.

In both alternatives, A’s fee simple becomes a fee simple absolute on the 60th anniversary of the date of delivery of G’s deed, unless the property was used for nonresidential purposes on or before that date and, in Alternative 1, unless G has properly exercised his right of entry on or before that date.

Event or Events Affecting the Use of Land.

G.S. 41-32

only applies to possibilities of reverter, rights of entry, and executory interests if the vesting depends on an event or events affecting the use of land. The purpose of this restriction is to exempt family-oriented dispositions from the 60-year time limit in cases where the Statutory Rule Against Perpetuities is a more appropriate measure for controlling the interest.

Example 3.
G’s will devised real property “to my daughter A and her heirs, but if she should die without descendants, to my son B and his heirs.”

Although B has an executory interest preceded by a fee simple subject to an executory limitation, B’s executory interest is not controlled by

G.S. 41-32

because the event on which its vesting depends does not relate to the use of land. Instead, B’s executory interest is governed by the Statutory Rule Against Perpetuities, under which it is valid from creation because it complies with G.S. 41-15(a)(1).

The phrase “event or events affecting the use of land” is to be given an interpretation appropriate to its purpose. Thus, a devise to a church “so long as the church shall maintain and promulgate its present religious belief and faith and continue as a church” is not a family-oriented disposition and should be found to describe an event affecting the use of the land.

Exception for Certain Charitable and Governmental Interest.
The last sentence of

G.S. 41-32

exempts certain interests held by a charity, a government, or governmental agency or subdivision from the 60-year time limit. The excluded interests are those excluded from the Statutory Rule Against Perpetuities by

G.S. 41-18(5)

. That section codifies the common-law principle that a nonvested property interest held by a charity, a government, or a governmental agency or subdivision is excluded from the Rule Against Perpetuities if the interest was preceded by an interest held by another charity, government, or governmental agency or subdivision.

Example 4.
G devised real property “to the X School District so long as the premises are used for school purposes, and upon the cessation of such use, to Y City.” The nonvested property interest in favor of Y City (an executory interest) is excluded from the Statutory Rule under

G.S. 41-18(5)

because it was preceded by a property interest (a fee simple determinable) held by a governmental subdivision, X School District. The fact that the interest of Y City is excluded from the Statutory Rule Against Perpetuities by

G.S. 41-18(5)

means that the 60-year limit imposed on certain executory interests by

G.S. 41-32

does not apply.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Perpetuities Reform in North Carolina: The Uniform Statutory Rule Against Perpetuities, Nondonative Transfers, and Honorary Trusts,” see 74 N.C.L. Rev. 1783 (1996).

§ 41-33.
Prospective application.

This Article applies only to a property interest or arrangement that is created on or after October 1, 1995.

History.

1995, c. 525, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Perpetuities Reform in North Carolina: The Uniform Statutory Rule Against Perpetuities, Nondonative Transfers, and Honorary Trusts,” see 74 N.C.L. Rev. 1783 (1996).

§§ 41-34 through 41-39.

Reserved for future codification purposes.